dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="/rok__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>rok</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rok</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>roku</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rokowi</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>roku</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rokiem</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>roku</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lata</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lata</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lat</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>latom</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>latach</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>latami/laty</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lata</l><r>rok<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jajnik__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iem</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gów/no__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>no</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>no</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nu</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nem</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>no</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ien</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nom</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nach</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nami</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kraj__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="muzułman/in__n_mp">
      <e><p>          <l>in</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ina</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ina</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inowi</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inie</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inem</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inie</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>in<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="akademik"><i>akademik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="deszcz"><i>deszcz</i><par n="kraj__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="gówno"><i>gów</i><par n="gów/no__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="jajnik"><i>jajnik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="kraj"><i>kraj</i><par n="kraj__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="mianownik"><i>mianownik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="muzułmanin"><i>muzułman</i><par n="muzułman/in__n_mp"/></e>
    <e lm="podręcznik"><i>podręcznik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="rok"><i></i><par n="/rok__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="spójnik"><i>spójnik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="słonecznik"><i>słonecznik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="zwrotnik"><i>zwrotnik</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="świerk"><i>świerk</i><par n="jajnik__n_mi"/></e>
